New York, session 2025-2026, S10019.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subsection (i) of section 3425 of the insurance law is 2 amended to read as follows: 3 (i) (1) No insurer shall refuse to issue or renew a covered policy 4 solely on the ground of the advanced age of the applicant or insured. 5 (2) With respect to automobile insurance policies, no insurer shall 6 increase the premium billed to an insured who is sixty years of age or 7 over for the renewal of an existing policy solely on the ground of the 8 age of the insured. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 10 ing the date on which it shall have become a law and shall apply to 11 renewals of policies issued on and after such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04832-01-5